Vermont, session 2025-2026, H335.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 29 V.S.A. § 161 is amended to read:
§ 161. REQUIREMENTS ON STATE CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS
VT LEG #380274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.335
2025 Page 2 of 3
* * *
(d) Subsections (a) through (c) and subsection (g) of this section shall not
apply to maintenance or construction projects carried out by the Agency of
Transportation and by the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
* * *
(g) Employers and subcontractors contracting with the State of Vermont
pursuant to this section shall keep a true and accurate record of all employees
working on the project.
(1) For each employee, the record shall include:
(A) the name of the employee;
(B) the address of the employee;
(C) the hours worked by the employee;
(D) the wages paid to the employee;
(E) the employee’s rate of pay; and
(F) the classification of the employee; the licensed trades shall supply
proof of classification of journey workers and indentured apprentices.
(2) The records described in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted weekly by U.S. mail or electronic mail to the State agency
overseeing the construction project. The records shall be accompanied by a
signed statement from the employer or subcontractor verifying the accuracy of
the records.
VT LEG #380274 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.335
2025 Page 3 of 3
(3) Each employer and subcontractor shall preserve the records
described in subdivision (1) of this section for three years from the date of
completion of the State project. The records shall be available for inspection
by the Commissioner of Labor or the Attorney General at any reasonable time
upon request.
(4) The records received pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section shall
be subject to inspection or copying pursuant to 1 V.S.A. §§ 315–320.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380274 v.1